Washington statutes.
RCW 10.93.060

Privileges and immunities applicable.

All of the privileges and immunities from liability, exemption from laws, ordinances, and rules, all pension, relief, disability, worker's compensation insurance, and other benefits which apply to the activity of officers, agents, or employees of any law enforcement agency when performing their respective functions within the territorial limits of their respective agencies shall apply to them and to their primary commissioning agencies to the same degree and extent while such persons are engaged in the performance of authorized functions and duties under this chapter.

[ 1985 c 89 s 6.]